District of Columbia statutes.
4-1105

Report.

The D.C. General Hospital Commission shall report, on an annual basis beginning December 31, 1989, to the Council of the District of Columbia regarding the development of the program and the number of patients served.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-210, § 6, 36 DCR 478
1981 Ed., § 3-1105.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of §§ 1801 and 1802 of the Service Improvement and Fiscal Year 2000 Budget Support Act of 1999, see § 2 of Burial Assistance Program Reestablishment Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-76, April 5, 2000, law notification 47 DCR 2633).